Utah statutes.
70A-8-504.   Duty of securities intermediary to maintain financial asset.
(1)  A securities intermediary shall promptly obtain and thereafter maintain a
financial asset in a quantity corresponding to the aggregate of all security
entitlements it has established in favor of its entitlement holders with
respect to that financial asset.  The securities intermediary may maintain
those financial assets directly or through one or more other securities
intermediaries.
(2)  Except to the extent otherwise agreed by its entitlement holder, a
securities intermediary may not grant any security interests in a financial
asset it is obligated to maintain pursuant to Subsection (1).
(3)  A securities intermediary satisfies the duty in Subsection (1) if:
(a)  the securities intermediary acts with respect to the duty as agreed upon
by the entitlement holder and the securities intermediary; or
(b)  in the absence of agreement, the securities intermediary exercises due
care in accordance with reasonable commercial standards to obtain and maintain
the financial asset.
(4)  This section does not apply to a clearing corporation that is itself the
obligor of an option or similar obligation to which its entitlement holders
have security entitlements.
